Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 1. General Benefits
§ 1338.
Weekly benefits.

Each eligible individual who is totally unemployed in any week shall be paid with respect to such a week a weekly benefit amount determined as provided in this section.

, (c)[Repealed.]

(d) (1)

To qualify for benefits an individual must:

An individual filing a new claim for unemployment compensation shall, at the time of filing of such claim, be advised that:

unemployment compensation is subject to federal and State income tax;

requirements exist pertaining to estimated tax payments;

the individual may elect to have federal income tax deducted and withheld from the individual’s payment of unemployment compensation in the amount specified in the federal Internal Revenue Code;

the individual who elects to have federal income tax deducted and withheld shall have State income tax withheld at 24 percent of the federal rate; and

the individual shall be permitted to change a previously elected withholding once during each benefit year.

Amounts deducted and withheld from unemployment compensation shall remain in the Unemployment Trust Fund until transferred to the federal and State taxing authority as a payment of income tax.

The Commissioner shall follow all procedures specified by the U.S. Department of Labor and the federal Internal Revenue Service pertaining to the deducting and withholding of income tax.

Amounts shall be deducted and withheld under this section only after amounts are deducted and withheld for any overpayments of unemployment compensation, child support obligations, or other amounts required to be deducted and withheld under this chapter.

have been paid in one quarter of his or her base period wages in employment with an employer or employers subject to this chapter that equal at least $1,000.00; and

have been paid in his or her base period additional wages in employment with an employer or employers subject to this chapter that equal or exceed 40 percent of the total wages paid in the highest quarter of his or her base period; and

have earned subsequent to the beginning of his or her most recent benefit year wages in employment with an employer or employers subject to this chapter that equal or exceed four times his or her weekly benefit amount as determined under subsection (e) of this section for that prior benefit year.

(2)

The base period wages shall not include any wages paid by an employing unit based on a separation for gross misconduct under subdivision 1344(a)(2)(B) of this title.

(e)

Subsection (e) effective until occurrence of contingency; see also contingent amendments by

2021, No. 51

, §§ 11 and 12 set out below.

For benefit years beginning on January 3, 1988 and subsequent thereto, an individual’s weekly benefit amount shall be determined by dividing the individual’s two high quarter total subject wages required under subdivision (d)(1) of this section by 45, provided that the weekly benefit amount so determined shall not exceed the maximum weekly benefit amount computed as provided in this section.

(e) (1)

Contingent amendments to subsection (e) by

2021, No. 51

, § 11; see also subsection (e) effective until occurrence of contingency set out above and contingent amendment to subsection (e) by 2021, No. 51, § 12 set out below.

An individual’s weekly benefit amount shall be determined by dividing the individual’s two high quarter total subject wages required under subdivision (d)(1) of this section by 45, provided that the weekly benefit amount so determined shall not exceed the maximum weekly benefit amount computed pursuant to subsection (f) of this section.

(2)

Notwithstanding the maximum weekly benefit amount computed pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, an individual shall receive a supplemental benefit of $25.00 per week in addition to the amount determined pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.

(e)

Contingent amendment to subsection (e) by 2021, No. 51, § 12; see also subsection (e) effective until occurrence of contingencies and contingent amendment to subsection (e) by 2021, No. 51, § 11 set out above.

An individual’s weekly benefit amount shall be determined by dividing the individual’s two high quarter total subject wages required under subdivision (d)(1) of this section by 45, provided that the weekly benefit amount so determined shall not exceed the maximum weekly benefit amount computed pursuant to subsection (f) of this section.

(f) (1)

The maximum weekly benefit amount shall be annually adjusted on the first day of the first calendar week in July to an amount equal to 57 percent of the State annual average weekly wage as determined by subsection (g) of this section.

(2)

Notwithstanding any provision of subdivision (1) of this subsection to the contrary:

(A)

The maximum weekly benefit amount shall not increase in any year that advances made to the State Unemployment Compensation Fund pursuant to Title XII of the Social Security Act, as amended, remain unpaid.

(B)

The maximum weekly benefit amount shall not decrease.

(g)

On or before the first day of June of each year, the total wages reported on contribution reports for the preceding calendar year shall be divided by the average monthly number of covered workers (determined by dividing the total covered employment reported on contribution reports pursuant to this chapter for the preceding year by 12). The State average annual wage thus obtained shall be divided by 52 and the State average weekly wage thus determined shall be rounded down to the nearest dollar.

(h)

Effective with the first calendar week of July, 1990, and with the first full calendar weeks of each July thereafter, the minimum quarterly wage requirement of subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall be adjusted by a percentage increase equal to the percentage increase, if any, in the State minimum wage effective during the prior calendar year.
This adjusted minimum quarterly wage requirement shall be applicable to new claims for benefits with effective dates during or after the first full calendar week of July 1990, and the first full calendar weeks of each July thereafter.

Income tax withholding.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 51

, § 1;

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1963, No. 84

, § 3;

1969, No. 42

, § 2;

1971, No. 71

, § 1, eff. April 15, 1971;

1973, No. 231

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 2, 3;

1977, No. 64

, § 16;

1981, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 20, 1982;

1983, No. 16

, § 7, eff. May 1, 1983;

1985, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1991, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1993, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1995, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997;

1997, No. 101

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2001, No. 143

(Adj. Sess.), § 65, eff. June 21, 2002;

2003, No. 70

(Adj. Sess.), § 64, eff. March 1, 2004;

2009, No. 2

(Sp. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 9, 2009;

2009, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 2011;

2013, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2021, No. 51

, § 10, eff. June 1, 2021;

2021, No. 51

, §§ 11, 12.

§ 1338a.
Disregarded earnings.

An individual shall be deemed “partially unemployed” in any week of less than full-time work if the wages earned by the individual with respect to such week are less than the weekly benefit amount the individual would be entitled to receive if totally unemployed and eligible. As used in this section, “wages” in any one week includes only that amount of remuneration to the nearest dollar that is in excess of 50 percent of the individual’s weekly wage.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, an individual shall not be deemed to be “partially unemployed” if the individual performed less than full-time work only because there was a holiday in that week for which the individual was entitled to holiday pay.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 64

, eff. March 31, 1959; amended

1967, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 20, 1968;

1971, No. 70

, eff. April 15, 1971;

1979, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.). § 8, eff. April 14, 1980;

1991, No. 62

;

2001, No. 56

, § 2;

2009, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. July 1, 2012;

2013, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 1339.
Weekly benefit for partial unemployment.

Each eligible individual who is partially unemployed in any week shall be paid with respect to such week a partial benefit.
Such partial benefit shall be an amount equal to the difference between his or her weekly benefit amount and his or her wages, as used in section 1338a of this title, for such week.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 86

, § 11, eff. May 10, 1981.

§ 1340.
Computation of benefits.

Except as provided in subchapter 2 of this chapter, the maximum total amount of benefits payable to any eligible individual during any benefit year shall not exceed the lesser of 26 times his or her weekly benefit amount or 46 percent of the total wages paid to the individual during his or her base period.

An individual who is discharged by his or her last employing unit for misconduct connected with his or her work under subdivision 1344(a)(1)(A) of this title is limited to a maximum amount during the benefit year which is the lesser of the maximum amount determined under subsection (a) of this section or 23 times his or her weekly benefit amount, provided that the individual has not already received more than 23 weeks in his or her benefit year.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 51

, § 2;

1959, No. 107

, § 2, eff. April 10, 1959;

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1963, No. 84

, § 5;

1971, No. 1

, § 1, eff. Oct. 11, 1970;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § E.401.3, eff. June 3, 2010;

2009, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2011.

§ 1340a.
Self-Employment Assistance Program.

As used in this section:

“Full-time basis” means that the individual is devoting the necessary time as determined by the Commissioner to establish a business that will serve as a full-time occupation for that individual.

“Regular benefits” shall have the same meaning as in subdivision 1421(5) of this title.

“Self-employment assistance activities” means activities approved by the Commissioner in which an individual participates for the purpose of establishing a business and becoming self-employed, including entrepreneurial training, business counseling, and technical assistance.

“Self-employment assistance allowance” means an allowance payable in lieu of regular benefits from the Unemployment Compensation Trust Fund to an individual who meets the requirements of this section.

“Self-Employment Assistance Program” means the program under which an individual who meets the requirements of subsection (d) of this section is eligible to receive an allowance in lieu of regular benefits for the purpose of assisting that individual in establishing a business and becoming self-employed.

The weekly amount of the self-employment assistance allowance payable to an individual shall be equal to the weekly benefit amount for regular benefits otherwise payable pursuant to this title.

The maximum amount of the self-employment assistance allowance paid pursuant to this section shall not exceed the maximum amount of benefits established pursuant to section 1340 of this title with respect to any benefit year.

An individual may receive a self-employment assistance allowance if that individual:
(d) (1) An individual may receive a self-employment assistance allowance if that individual:

is eligible to receive regular benefits or would be eligible to receive regular benefits except for the requirements described in subdivisions (2)(A) and (B) of this subsection (d);

is identified by a worker profiling system as an individual likely to exhaust regular benefits;

has received the approval of the Commissioner to participate in a program providing self-employment assistance activities;

is engaged actively on a full-time basis in activities that may include training related to establishing a business and becoming self-employed; and

has filed a weekly claim for the self-employment assistance allowance and provided the information the Commissioner requires.

A self-employment allowance shall be payable to an individual at the same interval, on the same terms, and subject to the same conditions as regular benefits pursuant to this chapter, except:

the requirements of section 1343 of this title, relating to availability for work, efforts to secure work, and refusal to accept work, are not applicable to the individual; and

the individual is not considered to be self-employed pursuant to subdivision 1301(24) of this title;
(B) (i) the individual is not considered to be self-employed pursuant to subdivision 1301(24) of this title;

an individual who meets the requirements of this section shall be considered to be unemployed pursuant to section 1338 of this title; and

an individual who fails to participate in self-employment assistance activities or who fails to engage actively on a full-time basis in activities, including training, relating to the establishment of a business and becoming self-employed shall be disqualified from receiving an allowance for the week in which the failure occurs.

The self-employment assistance allowance may be paid to up to 35 qualified individuals at any time, provided that the number of qualified individuals receiving a self-employment assistance allowance at any time shall not exceed five percent of the total number of individuals receiving regular benefits at that time.

The self-employment assistance allowance shall be charged to the Unemployment Compensation Trust Fund.
(f) (1) The self-employment assistance allowance shall be charged to the Unemployment Compensation Trust Fund.

In the event that the self-employment assistance allowance cannot be charged to the Unemployment Compensation Trust Fund pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, the allowance shall be charged in accordance with section 1325 of this title.

The Commissioner may approve a program upon determining that it will provide self-employment assistance activities to qualified individuals.

The Commissioner shall adopt rules to implement this section.
(h) (1) The Commissioner shall adopt rules to implement this section.

The rules adopted pursuant to this subsection shall include a detailed explanation of how an individual may apply for and establish eligibility for the Self-Employment Assistance Program and any criteria that the Commissioner will consider in determining whether to approve a program.

The Commissioner may suspend the Self-Employment Assistance Program with approval of the Secretary of Administration and notice to the House Committee on Commerce and Economic Development and the Senate Committee on Finance in the event that the Program presents unintended adverse consequences to the Unemployment Compensation Trust Fund.

The Self-Employment Assistance Program may not result in any cost to the Unemployment Trust Fund in excess of the cost that would be incurred by the State and charged to the Fund if the Program were not in operation.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. Feb. 20, 2020.

§ 1341.
Repealed.
1965, No. 76, § 2, eff. May 26, 1965.

§ 1342.
Repealed.
1959, No. 83, § 1, eff. April 2, 1959.

§ 1343.
Conditions.

An unemployed individual shall be eligible to receive benefits with respect to any week only if the Commissioner finds that all of the following requirements are met and the individual:

Has registered for work at and thereafter has continued to report at an employment office in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Board.

Has made a claim for benefits in accordance with the provisions of section 1346 of this title.

Is able to work, and is available for work; provided, that in determining the availability of any individual during any week, the Commissioner may require, in addition to registration at any employment office, that the individual participate in reemployment services, or at any time make such other efforts to secure suitable work as the Commissioner may reasonably direct under the circumstances and to supply proper evidence thereof; and shall, if the individual fails without good cause to do so, be ineligible for each week such failure continues; provided further that no claimant shall be considered ineligible in any week of unemployment for failure to comply with the provisions of this subdivision if such failure is due to an illness or disability that occurs after the claimant has registered for work, filed a claim for benefits and during a week for which the individual was entitled to waiting period credit or benefit payments, and no work that would have been considered suitable but for the illness or disability has been offered after the beginning of such illness or disability.

[Repealed.]

Qualifies for a weekly benefit computed in accordance with section 1338 of this title.

Participates in reemployment services, such as job search assistance services, if he or she has been determined to be likely to exhaust regular benefits and needs reemployment services pursuant to a profiling system established by the Commissioner.

Is not self-employed or engaged in self-employment to the extent that it makes him or her unavailable for work.

Has given written notice of resignation to his or her employer and the employer subsequently made the termination of employment effective prior to the date of termination as given in the notice. Provided that the claimant could not establish good cause for leaving work pursuant to subdivision 1344(a)(2)(A) of this title and was not discharged for misconduct as provided in subdivision 1344(a)(1)(A) or for gross misconduct as provided in subdivision 1344(a)(2)(B), in no case shall unemployment benefits awarded under this subdivision exceed four weeks or extend beyond the date of separation as provided in the employee’s notice to the employer.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, any otherwise eligible claimant regularly attending a training course or program approved for him or her by the Commissioner shall be deemed to be available for work and while attending the course and making satisfactory progress in the training shall not be denied benefits solely because of his or her attendance at the course or because of his or her refusal of an offer of suitable work. Benefits paid to an eligible claimant regularly attending a training course or program approved pursuant to this subsection for any unemployment following his or her refusal of an offer of suitable work, shall not be charged against the experience rating record of any employer, but shall be charged to the Fund.

After March 31, 1984 benefits are payable on the basis of service in employment as defined in subdivisions 1301(6)(A)(ix) and (x) of this title, in the same amount, on the same terms, and subject to the same conditions as benefits payable on the basis of other service subject to this chapter, except that:

With respect to services performed in an instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity for an educational institution, benefits shall not be payable on the basis of such services for any week of unemployment commencing during the period between two successive academic years or terms (or, when an agreement provides instead for a similar period between two regular but not successive terms, during such period) or during a period of paid sabbatical leave provided for in the individual’s contract, to any individual if such individual performs such services in the first of such academic years or terms and if there is a contract or reasonable assurance that such individual will perform services in any such capacity for any educational institution in the second of such academic years or terms.

With respect to services performed in any other capacity for an educational institution benefits shall not be payable on the basis of such services to any individual for any week of unemployment that commences during a period between two successive academic years or terms if such individual performs such services in the first of such academic years or terms and there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services for any educational institution in the second of such academic years or terms, except that if benefits are denied to any individual under this subdivision and such individual was not offered an opportunity to perform such services for the educational institution for the second of such academic years or terms, such individual shall be entitled to a retroactive payment of the benefits for each week for which the individual filed a timely claim for benefits and for which benefits were denied solely by reason of this subdivision.

With respect to any services described in subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection, benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services in any such capacities to any individual for any week that commences during an established and customary vacation period or holiday recess if such individual performs such services in the period immediately before such vacation period or holiday recess, and there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services in the period immediately following such vacation period or holiday recess.

With respect to any services described in subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection, benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services in any such capacities as specified in subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) to any individual who performed such services in an educational institution while in the employ of an educational service agency. As used in this subdivision, the term “educational service agency” means a governmental agency or governmental entity that is established and operated exclusively for the purpose of providing such services to one or more educational institutions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any otherwise eligible claimant who was separated from employment due to an accident or injury resulting in a temporary total disability for which the claimant received workers’ compensation benefits under chapter 9 of this title shall be entitled to receive, after the termination of the period of temporary total disability, benefits that would have been available at the time of separation from employment. Payment of benefits for any week under this section shall be made only if, at the time the claimant files the initial claim, he or she was not monetarily eligible for benefits under subsection 1338(d) of this title and the claim is filed within six months after the termination of the period of temporary total disability.

After December 31, 1977, benefits shall not be paid to any individual on the basis of any services, substantially all of which consist of participating in sports or athletic events or training or preparing to so participate, for any week that commences during the period between two successive sport seasons, or similar periods, if such individual performed such services in the first of such seasons, or similar periods, and there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services in the later of such seasons, or similar periods.

After December 31, 1977, benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services performed by an alien unless such alien is an individual who was lawfully admitted for permanent residence at the time the services were performed, was lawfully present for purposes of performing the services, or was permanently residing in the United States under color of law at the time the services were performed, including an alien who was lawfully present in the United States as a result of the application of the provisions of section 203(a)(7) or section 212(d)(5) of the Immigration and Nationality Act. Provided, that any modifications to the provisions of section 3304(a)(14) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as provided by Public Law 94-566 that specify other conditions or other effective date than stated herein for the denial of benefits based on services performed by aliens and which modifications are required to be implemented under State law as a condition for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, shall be deemed applicable under the provisions of this section.
(f) (1) After December 31, 1977, benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services performed by an alien unless such alien is an individual who was lawfully admitted for permanent residence at the time the services were performed, was lawfully present for purposes of performing the services, or was permanently residing in the United States under color of law at the time the services were performed, including an alien who was lawfully present in the United States as a result of the application of the provisions of section 203(a)(7) or section 212(d)(5) of the Immigration and Nationality Act. Provided, that any modifications to the provisions of section 3304(a)(14) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as provided by Public Law 94-566 that specify other conditions or other effective date than stated herein for the denial of benefits based on services performed by aliens and which modifications are required to be implemented under State law as a condition for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, shall be deemed applicable under the provisions of this section.

Any data or information required of individuals applying for benefits to determine whether benefits are not payable to them because of their alien status shall be uniformly required from all applicants for benefits.

In the case of an individual whose application for benefits would otherwise be approved, no determination that benefits to such individual are not payable because of his or her alien status shall be made except upon a preponderance of the evidence.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 51

, § 3;

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1963, No. 84

, § 4;

1965, No. 94

, eff. June 14, 1965;

1971, No. 77

, § 6, eff. Dec. 31, 1971;

1977, No. 64

, §§ 17, 24, eff. Jan. 1, 1978;

1981, No. 86

, § 1, eff. May 3, 1981, § 12, eff. May 10, 1981;

1981, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.);

1983, No. 16

, § 9, eff. April 4, 1983;

1983, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4, 5, eff. April 1, 1984;

1989, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1991, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1993, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1997, No. 101

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1999, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2001, No. 56

, § 4;

2009, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. July 1, 2012;

2009, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. July 1, 2017;

2013, No. 173

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2017, No. 74

, § 51.